test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_FemInan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - старость M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: старость
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: старость
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: старости
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: старости
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: старости
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: старостью
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: старости
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: старости
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: старостей
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: старостях
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: старостям
      старость+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: старостями
  Noun - вещь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: вещь
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: вещь
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: вещи
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: вещи
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: вещи
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: вещью
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: вещи
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: вещи
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: вещей
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: вещах
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: вещам
      вещь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: вещами
  Noun - книга M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: книга
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: книгу
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: книги
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: книге
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: книге
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: книгой
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: книги
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: книги
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: книг
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: книгах
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: книгам
      книга+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: книгами
  Noun - революция M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: революция
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: революцию
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: революции
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: революции
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: революции
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: революцией
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: революции
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: революции
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: революций
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: революциях
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: революциям
      революция+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: революциями
  Noun - душа M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: душа
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: душу
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: души
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: душе
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: душе
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: душой
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: души
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: души
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: душ
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: душах
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: душам
      душа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: душами
  Noun - красота M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: красота
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: красоту
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: красоты
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: красоте
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: красоте
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: красотой
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: красоты
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: красоты
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: красот
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: красотах
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: красотам
      красота+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: красотами
  Noun - волна M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: волна
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: волну
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: волны
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: волне
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: волне
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: волной
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: волны
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: волны
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: волн
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: волнах
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: волнам
      волна¹+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: волнами
  Noun - железа M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: железа
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: железу
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: железы
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: железе
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: железе
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: железой
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: железы
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: железы
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: [желёз, желез]
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: железах
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: железам
      железа+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: железами
  Noun - рука M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: рука
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: руку
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: руки
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: руке
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: руке
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: рукой
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: руки
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: руки
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: рук
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: руках
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: рукам
      рука+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: руками
  Noun - сковорода M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: сковорода
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: сковороду
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: сковороды
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: сковороде
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: сковороде
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: сковородой
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: сковороды
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: сковороды
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: сковород
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: сковородах
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: сковородам
      сковорода+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: сковородами
